Vermont, session 2025-2026, H547.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 5131 is amended to read:
§ 5131. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(9) “Military protective order’’ means an order issued against a current
member of the U.S. Armed Forces, the Vermont National Guard, or the
national guard of another state or territory by a defendant’s commanding
officer, on a form prescribed by the United States Department of Defense.
VT LEG #385667 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.547
2026 Page 2 of 4
Sec. 2. 12 V.S.A. § 5133 is amended to read:
§ 5133. REQUESTS FOR AN ORDER AGAINST STALKING OR
SEXUAL ASSAULT
(a) A person, other than a family or household member as defined in 15
V.S.A. § 1101(2), may seek an order against stalking or sexual assault on
behalf of himself or herself themselves or his or her their children by filing a
complaint under this chapter. A minor 16 years of age or older may file a
complaint under this chapter seeking relief on his or her their own behalf. The
plaintiff shall submit an affidavit in support of the order and may include a
submission of written statements sworn before a person authorized pursuant to
10 U.S.C. § 936 or 5 U.S.C. § 303 to administer oaths.
* * *
(m) A military protective order and written statements sworn before a
person authorized pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 936 or 5 U.S.C. § 303 to administer
oaths shall be admissible evidence in proceedings under this chapter for the
purpose of establishing a relevant pattern or course of conduct.
Sec. 3. 15 V.S.A. § 1101 is amended to read:
§ 1101. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #385667 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.547
2026 Page 3 of 4
(8) “Military Protective Order’’ means an order issued against a current
member of the U.S. Armed Forces, the Vermont National Guard, or the
national guard of another state or territory by a defendant’s commanding
officer, on a form prescribed by the United States Department of Defense.
Sec. 4. 15 V.S.A. § 1103 is amended to read:
§ 1103. REQUESTS FOR RELIEF
(a) Any family or household member may seek relief from abuse by
another family or household member on behalf of themselves or their children
by filing a complaint under this chapter. A minor 16 years of age or older, or a
minor of any age who is in a dating relationship as defined in subdivision
1101(3) of this chapter, may file a complaint under this chapter seeking relief
on the minor’s own behalf. The plaintiff shall submit an affidavit in support of
the order and may include a submission of written statements sworn before a
person authorized pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 936 or 5 U.S.C. § 303 to administer
oaths.
* * *
(l) A military protective order and written statements sworn before a person
authorized pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 936 or 5 U.S.C. § 303 to administer oaths
shall be admissible evidence in proceedings under this chapter for the purpose
of establishing a relevant pattern or course of conduct.
VT LEG #385667 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.547
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 5. 20 V.S.A. § 942b is amended to read:
§ 942b. EXPENSES OF MILTARY COURTS
* * *
(g) The Adjutant General shall provide current and former members of the
National Guard who were the victims of sexual assault or sexual harassment
while members of the National Guard with financial assistance when the
victims participate in adverse administrative proceedings or Vermont Code of
Military Justice proceedings related to the sexual assault or sexual harassment.
The financial assistance shall cover the reasonable expenses incurred from
traveling to and from those proceedings. This section shall not be construed to
alter or expand a victim’s right to participate in such proceedings.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385667 v.1